Washington statutes.
RCW 2.72.005

Intent.

(1) In establishing an office of public guardianship and conservatorship, the legislature intends to promote the availability of guardianship, conservatorship, and alternate services that provide support for decision making for individuals who need them and for whom adequate services may otherwise be unavailable. The legislature reaffirms its commitment to treat liberty and autonomy as paramount values for all Washington residents and to authorize public guardianship and conservatorship only to the minimum extent necessary to provide for health or safety, or to manage financial affairs, when the legal conditions for appointment of a guardian or conservator are met. It does not intend to alter those legal conditions or to expand judicial authority to determine that any individual may be subject to guardianship or conservatorship.

(2) The legislature further recognizes that decision-making assistance for people who have limited capacity can preserve individual liberty and provide effective support responsive to individual needs and wishes. The legislature also recognizes that these services may be less expensive than guardianship and conservatorship for the state, the courts, and for individuals with limited capacity and their families.

[ 2020 c 312 s 401; 2019 c 215 s 1; 2007 c 364 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.